src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s6x30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - vanyrða: # 
    vanyrða+V+Inf: vanyrða
    vanyrða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [vanyrðir, vanyrðar]
    vanyrða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [vanyrdi, vanyrðaði]
    vanyrða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [vanyrdu, vanyrðaðu]
    vanyrða+V+Sup: [vanyrt, vanyrðað]
    vanyrða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [vanyrðaður, vanyrdur]
